Washington statutes.
RCW 11.130.001

Intent.

It is the intent of the legislature to protect the liberty and autonomy of all people of this state, and to enable them to exercise their rights under the law to the maximum extent, consistent with the capacity of each person. The legislature recognizes that people with incapacities have unique abilities and needs, and that some people with incapacities cannot exercise their rights or provide for their basic needs without the help of a guardian. However, their liberty and autonomy should be restricted through guardianship, conservatorship, emergency guardianship, emergency conservatorship, and other protective arrangements only to the minimum extent necessary to adequately provide for their own health or safety, or to adequately manage their financial affairs.

[ 2020 c 312 s 801.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2020 c 312: See note following RCW 11.130.915.